Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2341.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.343, No.176), known as The Fiscal Code, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE I-MHEALTH CARE FACILITY THREATASSESSMENT GRANT PROGRAMHOSPITAL SECURITY GRANT FUNDSection 101-M. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Contract." A contract with the department for the provision of a standardized threat and risk assessment platform under this article."Contractor." A person who enters into a contract with the department under s ection 103-M(b). "Department." The Department of Health of the Commonwealth."Grant." An award of money by the department to a health care facility under section 104-M. "Health care facility." As defined in section 802.1 of the act of July 19, 1979 (P.L.130, No.48), known as the Health Care Facilities Act."Program." The Health Care Facility Threat Assessment Grant Program established under section 102-M.Section 102-M. Establishment of program.The Health Care Facility Threat Assessment Grant Program is 20260HB2341PN3486 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930313233 established within the department to improve safety and security in health care facilities through the procurement and deployment of a standardized threat and risk assessment platform. The department shall implement the program.Section 103-M. Use of funds.(a) Exclusive use.--Money appropriated to the department for the program shall be used exclusively for the implementation of the program.(b) Platform.--The department shall expend money appropriated to the department for the program to contract with a contractor for the provision of a standardized threat and risk assessment platform. The platform shall include the following capabilities:(1) A structured threat and risk assessment framework tailored to health care facility operations.(2) Real-time data collection and digital reporting tools.(3) Workflow management tools for risk identification, mitigation planning and compliance monitoring.(4) Collaborative features for use by health care facilities, health care administrators and public safety stakeholders to conduct standardized evaluations, track corrective actions and generate comprehensive reports for informed decision making.(5) Any additional capabilities determined by the department to be necessary for the purpose of this article.(c) Contractor selection.--Subject to 62 Pa.C.S. Ch. 5 (relating to source selection and contract formation), the department shall utilize a competitive bidding process to select a contractor, unless the department determines that only one 20260HB2341PN3486 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 contractor has the capacity and willingness to perform the duties under this article.(d) Contractor obligations.--A contractor shall remain obligated to perform in accordance with the terms of the contract until all money obligated to the contractor under the contract has been fully expended, notwithstanding the exhaustion of money appropriated to the department for the program during a fiscal year.(e) Breach of contract.--A contractor who fails to perform in accordance with the terms of the contract shall be deemed in breach of contract, and the applicable contractual remedies relating to the breach shall apply.(f) Award of grants.--The department shall expend money appropriated to the department for the program to award grants to health care facilities under section 104-M.Section 104-M. Grants to health care facilities.(a) Application.--A health care facility may apply to the department for a grant under the program in a form and manner determined by the department. Applications shall be made available electronically and shall include documentation as required by the department.(b) Review.--Upon receipt of an application, the department shall review the application and may approve or disapprove the application or award an amount less than requested in the application. The department shall provide a written explanation to the health care facility for a disapproval or a partial grant award.(c) Grant agreements.--Upon approving an application under subsection (b), the department may not disburse a grant award until the department and the health care facility enter into a 20260HB2341PN3486 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 fully executed grant agreement. The agreement shall include the following:(1) Terms and conditions of the grant, including applicable Federal and State laws and reporting requirements.(2) Departmental policies and procedures applicable to the program.(3) Authorization for electronic execution by all parties.(d) Award and use.--(1) The department shall disburse an approved grant award to the health care facility no later than 90 days from the date of application approval under subsection (b).(2) A grant award shall be used exclusively by a health care facility to procure a standardized threat and risk assessment platform from a contractor under section 103-M(c). A grant award shall not exceed the cost incurred by a health care facility to procure a standardized threat and risk assessment platform from a contractor under section 103-M(c).(e) Annual requirements.--In order to receive a grant in each calendar year the program is operational, a health care facility must annually apply to the department for a grant in accordance with subsection (a).Section 105-M. Certification requirements for health care facilities.In a form and manner determined by the department, a health care facility applying for a grant under the program shall certify that:(1) the health care facility is licensed by the department and in good standing;(2) the health care facility agrees to comply with the 20260HB2341PN3486 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 requirements of the program;(3) failure to comply with program requirements:(i) shall result in removal from the program; and(ii) may result in recoupment of grant money; and(4) the information provided in the application and supporting documents and forms are true and correct in all material respects. An authorized representative of a health care facility who knowingly provides false information shall be subject to 18 Pa.C.S. § 4904 (relating to unsworn falsification to authorities).Section 106-M. Reporting.(a) Annual report.--No later than December 31 of the year after the effective date of this subsection and by December 31 of each year thereafter, the department shall publish a report on its publicly accessible Internet website on the program. The report shall include all of the following information:(1) A description of the contracting process and the contractor selected by the department under section 104-M.(2) The number and type of health care facilities that received grants under the program.(3) The amount of each grant awarded under the program.(4) The number and type of health care facilities utilizing the standardized threat and risk assessment platform from the contractor under section 103-M(c).(5) Any instances when health care facilities received grants but failed to utilize the standardized threat and risk assessment platform from the contractor under section 103-M(c).(6) A summary of risk assessments conducted by health care facilities that received grants under the program.20260HB2341PN3486 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (7) A summary of corrective actions initiated by health care facilities in response to risk assessments conducted under the program.(8) The total amount of money distributed under the program during the preceding calendar year.(9) An aggregate total, by county, of health care facilities receiving grants under the program.(10) Recommendations for improving the administration or effectiveness of the program.(b) Submission.--The department shall submit the report under subsection (a) to all of the following:(1) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the Senate.(2) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Appropriations Committee of the House of Representatives.(3) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health and Human Services Committee of the Senate.(4) The chairperson and minority chairperson of the Health Committee of the House of Representatives.(c) Final report.--Upon the cessation of the program, including the full disbursement of all money appropriated to the department for the program and the termination of grant activity, the department shall publish and submit a final report in accordance with this section."COMMISSION." THE PENNSYLVANIA COMMISSION ON CRIME AND DELINQUENCY."ELIGIBLE APPLICANT." A NONPROFIT HOSPITAL THAT IS AN EXEMPT ORGANIZATION AS DEFINED UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 501(C)(3) (RELATING TO EXEMPTION FROM TAX ON CORPORATIONS, CERTAIN TRUSTS, ETC.)."ELIGIBLE PROJECT." SECURITY ENHANCEMENTS DESIGNED TO 20260HB2341PN3486 - 7 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 PROTECT THE SAFETY AND SECURITY OF PATIENTS, EMPLOYERS, EMPLOYEES, VISITORS AND USERS OF A HOSPITAL LOCATED IN THIS COMMONWEALTH, INCLUDING CONDUCTING PHYSICAL SECURITY ASSESSMENTS."FUND." THE HOSPITAL SECURITY GRANT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER SECTION 102-M."HOSPITAL." THE TERM SHALL MEAN THE SAME AS DEFINED UNDER SECTION 802.1 OF THE ACT OF JULY 19, 1979 (P.L.130, NO.48), KNOWN AS THE HEALTH CARE FACILITIES ACT . "PHYSICAL SECURITY ASSESSMENT." A STRATEGIC EVALUATION OF A HOSPITAL'S FACILITIES, PROGRAMS AND OPERATIONAL PROCEDURES USED TO IDENTIFY POTENTIAL SECURITY THREATS CONDUCTED BY THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE RISK AND VULNERABILITY ASSESSMENT TEAM OR OTHER PROFESSIONAL PHYSICAL SECURITY ASSESSMENT EXPERTS."SECURITY ENHANCEMENT." THE TERM INCLUDES:(1) SAFETY AND SECURITY PLANNING, INCLUDING A PHYSICAL SECURITY ASSESSMENT.(2) PURCHASE OF SAFETY AND SECURITY EQUIPMENT. (3) PURCHASE OF SECURITY-RELATED TECHNOLOGY, WHICH MAY INCLUDE:(I) METAL DETECTORS.(II) PROTECTIVE LIGHTING.(III) SURVEILLANCE EQUIPMENT.(IV) SPECIAL EMERGENCY COMMUNICATIONS EQUIPMENT.(V) ELECTRONIC LOCKSETS.(VI) DEADBOLTS.(VII) TRAUMA KITS.(VIII) THEFT-CONTROL DEVICES.(4) SAFETY AND SECURITY TRAINING.(5) THREAT AWARENESS AND RESPONSE TRAINING.20260HB2341PN3486 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) UPGRADES TO EXISTING STRUCTURES THAT ENHANCE SAFETY AND SECURITY.(7) VULNERABILITY AND THREAT ASSESSMENTS. (8) SPECIALTY TRAINED CANINES. (9) OTHER SAFETY-RELATED OR SECURITY-RELATED PROJECT THAT ENHANCES THE SAFETY OR SECURITY OF A HOSPITAL.SECTION 102-M. ESTABLISHMENT.THE HOSPITAL SECURITY GRANT FUND IS ESTABLISHED WITHIN THE STATE TREASURY. THE PURPOSE OF THE MONEY IN THE FUND SHALL BE TO IMPROVE SAFETY AND SECURITY IN HOSPITALS.SECTION 103-M. USE OF FUNDS.(A) AWARD OF GRANTS.--THE COMMISSION SHALL EXPEND MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE COMMISSION BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FOR THE FUND TO AWARD GRANTS TO HOSPITALS UNDER SECTION 104-M.(B) EXCLUSIVE USE.--MONEY, INCLUDING APPROPRIATED MONEY AND ACCRUED INTEREST, DEPOSITED INTO THE FUND SHALL BE APPROPRIATED ON A CONTINUING BASIS TO THE COMMISSION AND USED EXCLUSIVELY BY THE COMMISSION FOR GRANTS UNDER THIS ARTICLE.SECTION 104-M. ADMINISTRATION OF FUND.(A) APPLICATION.--AN ELIGIBLE APPLICANT MAY APPLY TO THE COMMISSION FOR A GRANT FROM THE FUND IN A FORM AND MANNER DETERMINED BY THE COMMISSION. APPLICATIONS SHALL BE MADE AVAILABLE ELECTRONICALLY AND SHALL INCLUDE DOCUMENTATION AS REQUIRED BY THE COMMISSION.(B) REVIEW.--THE COMMISSION, IN CONSULTATION WITH THE GOVERNOR'S OFFICE OF HOMELAND SECURITY, THE DEPARTMENT OF HEALTH AND THE PENNSYLVANIA STATE POLICE, SHALL REVIEW COMPLETED APPLICATIONS RECEIVED.(C) ALLOCATION.--A GRANT FROM THE FUND SHALL NOT EXCEED $150,000 PER FISCAL YEAR FOR ELIGIBLE PROJECTS.20260HB2341PN3486 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (D) LIMITATIONS.--THE FOLLOWING SHALL APPLY TO GRANTS AWARDED FROM THE FUND:(1) THE COMMISSION MAY NOT PROVIDE GRANTS IN EXCESS OF THE AMOUNT IN THE FUND.(2) THE COMMISSION MAY PRORATE A GRANT AMOUNT TO AN ELIGIBLE APPLICANT.(3) GRANT MONEY ALLOCATED FROM THE FUND SHALL BE USED TO SUPPLEMENT AND NOT SUPPLANT EXISTING MONEY.(E) ELIGIBLE PROJECTS.--THE COMMISSION MAY ONLY AWARD GRANTS FROM THE FUND FOR ELIGIBLE PROJECTS. ELIGIBLE APPLICANTS MAY ONLY EXPEND GRANT MONEY RECEIVED FROM THE FUND ON ELIGIBLE PROJECTS.(F) ELIGIBILITY FOR REDEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECT.--(1) AN ELIGIBLE PROJECT THAT RECEIVES A GRANT UNDER THIS ARTICLE MAY BE THE SUBJECT OF AN AWARD FOR A REDEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECT UNDER CHAPTER 3 OF THE ACT OF FEBRUARY 9, 1999 (P.L.1, NO.1), KNOWN AS THE CAPITAL FACILITIES DEBT ENABLING ACT.(2) NOTHING IN THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE CONSTRUED TO MODIFY THE ELIGIBILITY REQUIREMENTS FOR REDEVELOPMENT ASSISTANCE CAPITAL PROJECTS UNDER THE CAPITAL FACILITIES DEBT ENABLING ACT.(G) ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES.--THE COMMISSION MAY NOT EXPEND MORE THAN 3% OF MONEY APPROPRIATED TO THE COMMISSION FOR THE FUND ON ADMINISTRATIVE EXPENSES.(H) APPLICATION PERIODS.--THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH APPLICATION PERIODS FOR THE SUBMISSION OF APPLICATIONS FOR A GRANT.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2341PN3486 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930